Utah statutes.
78B-11-121.   Change of award by arbitrator.

(1)  On motion to an arbitrator by a party to an arbitration proceeding, the arbitrator may modify or correct an award:

(a)  on any grounds stated in Subsection 78B-11-125(1)(a) or (c);

(b)  if the arbitrator has not made a final and definite award upon a claim submitted by the parties to the arbitration proceeding; or

(c)  to clarify the award.

(2)  A motion under Subsection (1) must be made and notice given to all parties within 20 days after the movant receives notice of the award.

(3)  A party to the arbitration proceeding must give notice of any objection to the motion within 10 days after receipt of the notice.

(4)  If a motion to the court is pending under Section 78B-11-123, 78B-11-124, or 78B-11-125, the court may submit the claim to the arbitrator to consider whether to modify or correct the award:

(a)  on any grounds stated in Subsection 78B-11-125(1)(a) or (c);

(b)  if the arbitrator has not made a final and definite award upon a claim submitted by the parties to the arbitration proceeding; or

(c)  to clarify the award.

(5)  An award modified or corrected pursuant to this section is subject to Subsection 78A-6-119(1) and Sections 78B-11-123, 78B-11-124, and 78B-11-125.

